Florida, session 2026, HB1085.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 282.31855, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
282.31855 Local Government Cybersecurity Protection
Program.—
(1) The Local Government Cybersecurity Protection Program
is created within the Florida Digital Service, to be
administered by the Florida Digital Service. The purpose of the
grant program is to assist eligible local governments in
mitigating and defending against cybersecurity threats,
including, but not limited to, ransomware incidents.
(2) Under the grant program, the Florida Digital Service
shall enter into data-sharing agreements with local governments
as necessary to facilitate the collection, analysis, and
exchange of security-related information to support the
detection, prevention, and response to cybersecurity incidents
consistent with s. 282.318.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1085 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1085, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
(3)(a) The Florida Digital Service shall administer the
grant program based on objective eligibility and evaluation
criteria to provide information technology commodities and
services directly to local governments for the purpose of
developing and enhancing cybersecurity risk management programs
consistent with s. 282.3185.
(b) The Florida Digital Service shall contract for
information technology commodities and services and shall award
such commodities and services to local governments eligible
under the grant program criteria.
(c) In awarding information technology commodities and
services, the Florida Digital Service shall give preference to
fiscally constrained counties as described in s. 218.67(1).
(d) Grants shall be awarded to eligible local governments
by December 1 of each year.
(e) A local government may purchase information technology
commodities and services from the contracts managed by the
Florida Digital Service to administer this section even if it
does not apply for or receive a grant award. The local
government shall be solely responsible for all costs associated
with such purchases.
(f) Beginning December 15, 2027, and each year thereafter,
the Florida Digital Service shall prepare and submit to the
Governor's Office of Policy and Budget and the chairs of the
legislative appropriations committees a report on the
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1085 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1085, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
implementation and outcomes of the grant program for the
preceding fiscal year. The report must include:
1. The total number of grant applications received and
number and dollar amount of grants awarded, as well as the
number of applications denied, withdrawn, or deemed ineligible.
2. A list of the local governments awarded a grant,
identifying the cybersecurity commodities or services funded by
each grant and their purpose.
3. A description of federal and other funds received and
used in furtherance of the grant program.
(4) The Florida Digital Service may apply for and accept
any funds or grants made available to it by any agency or
department of the Federal Government to further the grant
program.
(5) This section shall stand repealed on July 1, 2031,
unless reviewed and saved from repeal through reenactment by the
Legislature.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1085 -03-er